Nebraska, session 109, LB1183.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1183 LB1183
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-201 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this
section, all real property in this state, not expressly exempt therefrom,
shall be subject to taxation and shall be valued at fifty percent of its
actual value.
(2) Agricultural land and horticultural land as defined in section
77-1359 shall constitute a separate and distinct class of property for
purposes of property taxation, shall be subject to taxation, unless
expressly exempt from taxation, and shall be valued at thirty-seven and
five-tenths seventy-five percent of its actual value, except that for
school district taxes levied to pay the principal and interest on bonds
that are approved by a vote of the people on or after January 1, 2027
2022, such land shall be valued at twenty-five fifty percent of its
actual value.
(3) Agricultural land and horticultural land actively devoted to
agricultural or horticultural purposes which has value for purposes other
than agricultural or horticultural uses and which meets the
qualifications for special valuation under section 77-1344 shall
constitute a separate and distinct class of property for purposes of
property taxation, shall be subject to taxation, and shall be valued for
taxation at thirty-seven and five-tenths seventy-five percent of its
special valuation as defined in section 77-1343, except that for school
district taxes levied to pay the principal and interest on bonds that are
approved by a vote of the people on or after January 1, 2027 2022, such
land shall be valued at twenty-five fifty percent of its special
valuation as defined in section 77-1343.
(4) Historically significant real property which meets the
qualifications for historic rehabilitation valuation under sections
77-1385 to 77-1394 shall be valued for taxation as provided in such
sections.
-2-

LB1183 LB1183
2026 2026
(5) Tangible personal property, not including motor vehicles,
trailers, and semitrailers registered for operation on the highways of
this state, shall constitute a separate and distinct class of property
for purposes of property taxation, shall be subject to taxation, unless
expressly exempt from taxation, and shall be valued at its net book
value. Tangible personal property transferred as a gift or devise or as
part of a transaction which is not a purchase shall be subject to
taxation based upon the date the property was acquired by the previous
owner and at the previous owner's Nebraska adjusted basis. Tangible
personal property acquired as replacement property for converted property
shall be subject to taxation based upon the date the converted property
was acquired and at the Nebraska adjusted basis of the converted property
unless insurance proceeds are payable by reason of the conversion. For
purposes of this subsection, (a) converted property means tangible
personal property which is compulsorily or involuntarily converted as a
result of its destruction in whole or in part, theft, seizure,
requisition, or condemnation, or the threat or imminence thereof, and no
gain or loss is recognized for federal or state income tax purposes by
the holder of the property as a result of the conversion and (b)
replacement property means tangible personal property acquired within two
years after the close of the calendar year in which tangible personal
property was converted and which is, except for date of construction or
manufacture, substantially the same as the converted property.
Sec. 2. Section 77-5023, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-5023 (1) Pursuant to section 77-5022, the commission shall have
the power to increase or decrease the value of a class or subclass of
real property in any county or taxing authority or of real property
valued by the state so that all classes or subclasses of real property in
all counties fall within an acceptable range.
(2) An acceptable range is the percentage of variation from a
-3-

LB1183 LB1183
2026 2026
standard for valuation as measured by an established indicator of central
tendency of assessment. Acceptable ranges are: (a) For agricultural land
and horticultural land as defined in section 77-1359, thirty-four and
five-tenths sixty-nine to thirty-seven and five-tenths seventy-five
percent of actual value, except that for school district taxes levied to
pay the principal and interest on bonds that are approved by a vote of
the people on or after January 1, 2027 2022, the acceptable range is
twenty-two forty-four to twenty-five fifty percent of actual value; (b)
for lands receiving special valuation, thirty-four and five-tenths sixty-
nine to thirty-seven and five-tenths seventy-five percent of special
valuation as defined in section 77-1343, except that for school district
taxes levied to pay the principal and interest on bonds that are approved
by a vote of the people on or after January 1, 2027 2022, the acceptable
range is twenty-two forty-four to twenty-five fifty percent of special
valuation as defined in section 77-1343; and (c) for all other real
property, forty-six ninety-two to fifty one hundred percent of actual
value.
(3) Any increase or decrease shall cause the level of value
determined by the commission to be at the midpoint of the applicable
acceptable range.
(4) Any decrease or increase to a subclass of property shall also
cause the level of value determined by the commission for the class from
which the subclass is drawn to be within the applicable acceptable range.
(5) Whether or not the level of value determined by the commission
falls within an acceptable range or at the midpoint of an acceptable
range may be determined to a reasonable degree of certainty relying upon
generally accepted mass appraisal techniques.
Sec. 3. Section 79-1016, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1016 (1) On or before August 20, the county assessor shall
certify to the Property Tax Administrator the total taxable value by
-4-

LB1183 LB1183
2026 2026
school district in the county for the current assessment year on forms
prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. The county assessor may amend the
filing for changes made to the taxable valuation of the school district
in the county if corrections or errors on the original certification are
discovered. Amendments shall be certified to the Property Tax
Administrator on or before August 31.
(2) On or before October 10, the Property Tax Administrator shall
compute and certify to the State Department of Education the adjusted
valuation for the current assessment year for each class of property in
each school district and each local system. The adjusted valuation of
property for each school district and each local system, for purposes of
determining state aid pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act, shall reflect as nearly as possible state aid
value as defined in subsection (3) of this section. The Property Tax
Administrator shall notify each school district and each local system of
its adjusted valuation for the current assessment year by class of
property on or before October 10. Establishment of the adjusted valuation
shall be based on the taxable value certified by the county assessor for
each school district in the county adjusted by the determination of the
level of value for each school district from an analysis of the
comprehensive assessment ratio study or other studies developed by the
Property Tax Administrator, in compliance with professionally accepted
mass appraisal techniques, as required by section 77-1327. The Tax
Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations setting
forth standards for the determination of level of value for state aid
purposes.
(3) For purposes of this section, state aid value means:
(a) For real property other than agricultural and horticultural
land, forty-eight ninety-six percent of actual value;
(b) For agricultural and horticultural land, thirty-six seventy-two
percent of actual value as provided in sections 77-1359 to 77-1363. For
-5-

LB1183 LB1183
2026 2026
agricultural and horticultural land that receives special valuation
pursuant to section 77-1344, thirty-six seventy-two percent of special
valuation as defined in section 77-1343; and
(c) For personal property, the net book value as defined in section
77-120.
(4) On or before November 10, any local system may file with the Tax
Commissioner written objections to the adjusted valuations prepared by
the Property Tax Administrator, stating the reasons why such adjusted
valuations are not the valuations required by subsection (3) of this
section. The Tax Commissioner shall fix a time for a hearing. Either
party shall be permitted to introduce any evidence in reference thereto.
On or before January 1, the Tax Commissioner shall enter a written order
modifying or declining to modify, in whole or in part, the adjusted
valuations and shall certify the order to the State Department of
Education. Modification by the Tax Commissioner shall be based upon the
evidence introduced at hearing and shall not be limited to the
modification requested in the written objections or at hearing. A copy of
the written order shall be mailed to the local system within seven days
after the date of the order. The written order of the Tax Commissioner
may be appealed within thirty days after the date of the order to the Tax
Equalization and Review Commission in accordance with section 77-5013.
(5) On or before November 10, any local system or county official
may file with the Tax Commissioner a written request for a nonappealable
correction of the adjusted valuation due to clerical error as defined in
section 77-128 or, for agricultural and horticultural land, assessed
value changes by reason of land qualified or disqualified for special use
valuation pursuant to sections 77-1343 to 77-1347.01. On or before the
following January 1, the Tax Commissioner shall approve or deny the
request and, if approved, certify the corrected adjusted valuations
resulting from such action to the State Department of Education.
(6) On or before May 31 of the year following the certification of
-6-

LB1183 LB1183
2026 2026
adjusted valuation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, any local
system or county official may file with the Tax Commissioner a written
request for a nonappealable correction of the adjusted valuation due to
changes to the tax list that change the assessed value of taxable
property. Upon the filing of the written request, the Tax Commissioner
shall require the county assessor to recertify the taxable valuation by
school district in the county on forms prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner. The recertified valuation shall be the valuation that was
certified on the tax list, pursuant to section 77-1613, increased or
decreased by changes to the tax list that change the assessed value of
taxable property in the school district in the county in the prior
assessment year. On or before the following July 31, the Tax Commissioner
shall approve or deny the request and, if approved, certify the corrected
adjusted valuations resulting from such action to the State Department of
Education.
(7) No injunction shall be granted restraining the distribution of
state aid based upon the adjusted valuations pursuant to this section.
(8) A school district whose state aid is to be calculated pursuant
to subsection (5) of this section and whose state aid payment is
postponed as a result of failure to calculate state aid pursuant to such
subsection may apply to the state board for lump-sum payment of such
postponed state aid. Such application may be for any amount up to one
hundred percent of the postponed state aid. The state board may grant the
entire amount applied for or any portion of such amount. The state board
shall notify the Director of Administrative Services of the amount of
funds to be paid in a lump sum and the reduced amount of the monthly
payments. The Director of Administrative Services shall, at the time of
the next state aid payment made pursuant to section 79-1022, draw a
warrant for the lump-sum amount from appropriated funds and forward such
warrant to the district.
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
-7-

LB1183 LB1183
2026 2026
Sec. 5. Original section 79-1016, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 77-201 and 77-5023, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-